Maryland, session 2025, SB0338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (3) (I) [Civil] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring
camera, bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are
collected by the District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section and distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(II) 1. THE SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 3 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE FINES COLLECTED THE FINES COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT
COURT BY THE DISTRICT COURT AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY AND
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE
COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO
BE USED SOLELY TO ASSIST:
A. RECOVER THE COST OF IMPLEMENTING AND
ADMINISTERING THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 695 IN
BALTIMORE COUNTY AND INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY; AND
B. ASSIST IN COVERING THE COST OF ROADWAY AND
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY AND
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
2. FINES REMITTED DISTRIBUTED TO THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH
ARE SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING
THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED FOR USES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
3. NOT MORE THAN 49% OF THE FINES DISTRIBUTED TO
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH MAY BE USED TO RECOVER THE COST OF IMPLEMENTING AND
ADMINISTERING THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 695 AND
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
10–311.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 [or], § 21–810, OR § 21–811 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of Title 21, Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
Article – Transportation
21–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR
LONGER.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY;
OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS AN IMAGE RECORDED BY A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE REAR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
– 3 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. AT LEAST TWO TIME–STAMPED IMAGES OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT INCLUDE THE SAME STATIONARY OBJECT NEAR THE MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
3. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(4) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE HAVING ONE OR
MORE MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS CONNECTED TO A CAMERA SYSTEM CAPABLE OF
PRODUCING RECORDED IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES.
(5) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO HAS BEEN TRAINED AND CERTIFIED TO OPERATE A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM AND WHO IS:
(I) A POLICE OFFICER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE; OR
(III) A STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION CONTRACTOR.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY PLACE NOT MORE THAN THREE SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS IN EACH DIRECTION THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES TRAVELING ON
INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(II) NOT MORE THAN FOUR TWO SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
IN EACH DIRECTION MAY BE OPERATED IN OPERATION AT THE SAME TIME ON A
HIGHWAY SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AT LOCATIONS
IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND STATE
POLICE, OR THE BALTIMORE COUNTY POLICE DEPARTMENT AS BEING AT HIGH
RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR
DEATH.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY PLACE NOT MORE THAN TWO SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS IN EACH DIRECTION THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES TRAVELING ON
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(II) NOT MORE THAN THREE ONE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
SYSTEM IN EACH DIRECTION MAY BE OPERATED IN OPERATION AT THE SAME TIME
ON A HIGHWAY SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AT
LOCATIONS IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE
MARYLAND STATE POLICE, OR THE BALTIMORE COUNTY POLICE DEPARTMENT AS
BEING AT HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS
BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.
(3) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH
(1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY:
(I) WHEN BEING OPERATED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR; AND
(II) 1. IF ALL SPEED LIMIT SIGNS APPROACHING AND
WITHIN THE SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY ON WHICH THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS
LOCATED INCLUDE SIGNS THAT:
A. ARE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND MANUAL
ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES; AND
B. INDICATE THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN
USE; AND
2. IF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION ENSURES
THAT EACH SIGN THAT INDICATES THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE IS
PROXIMATE TO A DEVICE THAT DISPLAYS A REAL–TIME POSTING OF THE SPEED AT
WHICH A DRIVER IS TRAVELING. ONLY IF, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND
MANUAL ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES, A CONSPICUOUS ROAD SIGN IS
PLACED AT A REASONABLE DISTANCE CONSISTENT WITH NATIONAL GUIDELINES
BEFORE THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM ALERTING DRIVERS THAT A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE IN OPERATION.
(II) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR NEED NOT BE
PRESENT IN PERSON OR REMOTELY AT THE HIGHWAY CORRIDOR WHERE A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE.
(4) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED ON INTERSTATE
695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY BE USED ONLY TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF
VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT LEAST 16 12 MILES PER HOUR
ABOVE THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
– 5 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED ON INTERSTATE
83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY BE USED ONLY TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF
VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE
THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(5) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL
COMPLETE TRAINING BY THE MANUFACTURER OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
IN THE PROCEDURES FOR SETTING UP, TESTING, AND OPERATING THE SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM.
(II) ON COMPLETION OF THE TRAINING, THE MANUFACTURER
SHALL ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE TO THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR.
(III) THE CERTIFICATE OF TRAINING SHALL BE ADMITTED AS
EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(6) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL FILL OUT AND
SIGN A DAILY SET–UP LOG FOR A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM THAT:
(I) STATES THE DATE AND TIME WHEN AND THE LOCATION
WHERE THE SYSTEM WAS SET UP;
(II) STATES THAT THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR
SUCCESSFULLY PERFORMED, AND THE DEVICE PASSED, THE
MANUFACTURER–SPECIFIED SELF–TESTS OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
BEFORE PRODUCING A RECORDED IMAGE;
(III) SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
(IV) SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SHALL UNDERGO AN
ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION
LABORATORY.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT:
1. SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
2. SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(8) THE PROCUREMENT OF A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 1
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF AN IMAGE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION WHILE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL:
(I) PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) INDICATE ON THE CITATION THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL
PENALTY TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
– 7 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VI) AT LEAST ONE RECORDED IMAGE OF THE VEHICLE WITH A
DATA BAR IMPRINTED ON EACH IMAGE THAT INCLUDES THE SPEED OF THE VEHICLE
AND THE DATE AND TIME THE IMAGE WAS RECORDED;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY SHOULD BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A POLICE OFFICER EMPLOYED BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
STATE POLICE THAT, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE WAS BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL MAIL A WARNING
NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION DURING THE FIRST 90 DAYS THAT THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
IS IN OPERATION.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A PERSON WHO
IS NOT AN OWNER.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, A
CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2
WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THE
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
STATE, AND NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE
VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(E) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE OCCURRED AND THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION HAVE BEEN SATISFIED, SWORN TO, OR AFFIRMED BY AN OFFICER OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES
PRODUCED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS
CONTAINED IN THE CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING
ALLEGING A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OR
TESTIMONY OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR WHO PERFORMED THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR TO BE
PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE COURT AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE IN WRITING NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE
TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(F) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE VEHICLE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
– 9 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT DEEMS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND
MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS
NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION,
THE CLERK OF THE COURT MAY PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES
WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) ANY CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(G) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE REGISTRATION OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION; OR
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(2) SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR
THE VIOLATION.
(H) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE;
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF §
26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(I) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE, THE
CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION
OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL ADMINISTER AND
PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR PROVIDES, DEPLOYS, OR OPERATES A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON
THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
(K) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING
STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means:
– 11 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) A law enforcement agency of a local political subdivision that is
authorized to issue a citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic
laws or regulations; [or]
(ii) For a municipal corporation that does not maintain a police force,
an agency established or designated by the municipal corporation to implement this subtitle
using speed monitoring systems in accordance with this section; OR
(III) FOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS PLACED AND USED ON
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.
(3) (i) “Erroneous violation” means a potential violation submitted by a
speed monitoring system contractor for review by an agency that is apparently inaccurate
based on a technical variable that is under the control of the contractor.
(ii) “Erroneous violation” includes a potential violation based on:
1. A recorded image of a registration plate that does not
match the registration plate issued for the motor vehicle in the recorded image;
2. A recorded image that shows a stopped vehicle or no
progression;
3. An incorrectly measured speed for a motor vehicle;
4. A measured speed of a motor vehicle that is below the
threshold speed that would subject the owner to a civil citation under this section;
5. A recorded image that was taken outside of the hours and
days that speed monitoring systems are authorized for use in school zones; and
6. A recorded image that was taken by a speed monitoring
system with an expired calibration certificate.
(4) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a lessee
of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle rental or leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(5) “Program administrator” means an employee or a representative of the
local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION designated by the local
jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION to oversee a contract with a
speed monitoring system contractor.
(6) “Recorded image” means an image recorded by a speed monitoring
system:
(i) On:
1. A photograph;
2. A microphotograph;
3. An electronic image;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing:
1. The rear of a motor vehicle;
2. At least two time–stamped images of the motor vehicle that
include the same stationary object near the motor vehicle; and
3. On at least one image or portion of tape, a clear and legible
identification of the entire registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
(7) “School zone” means a designated roadway segment within up to a
half–mile radius of a school for any of grades kindergarten through grade 12 where
school–related activity occurs, including:
(i) Travel by students to or from school on foot or by bicycle; or
(ii) The dropping off or picking up of students by school buses or other
vehicles.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(9) “Speed monitoring system operator” means a representative of an agency
or contractor that operates a speed monitoring system.
– 13 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used [in] BY a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY USE
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY AND
INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(ii) Before a county may use a speed monitoring system on a State
highway at a location within a municipal corporation, the county shall:
1. Obtain the approval of the State Highway Administration;
2. Notify the municipal corporation of the State Highway
Administration’s approval of the use of a speed monitoring system at that location; and
3. Grant the municipal corporation 60 days from the date of
the county’s notice to the municipal corporation to enact an ordinance authorizing the
municipal corporation instead of the county to use a speed monitoring system at that
location.
(iii) 1. This subparagraph applies only in Prince George’s County.
2. In the county, a municipal corporation may implement and
use a speed monitoring system consistent with the requirements of this subsection on a
county highway at a location within its corporate limits if the municipal corporation:
A. Submits to the county a plan describing the boundary of
the applicable school zone and the proposed location of the speed monitoring system; and
B. Requests and receives permission from the county to use the
speed monitoring system at the proposed location.
3. If the county fails to respond to the request within 60 days,
the municipal corporation may implement and use the speed monitoring system as described
in the plan submission.
4. The county may not:
A. Unreasonably deny a request under this subparagraph; or
B. Place exactions, fees, or unreasonable restrictions on the
implementation and use of a speed monitoring system under this subparagraph.
5. The county shall state in writing the reasons for any denial
of a request under this subparagraph.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
6. A municipal corporation may contest in the circuit court a
county denial of a request under this subparagraph.
(iv) In Prince George’s County, if a municipal corporation has
established a school zone that is within one–quarter mile of a school zone established in
another municipal corporation, the municipal corporation may not implement or use a speed
monitoring system in that school zone unless it has obtained the approval of the other
municipal corporation.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of an
institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or within
one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of higher
education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that motor
vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
– 15 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; [or]
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
OR
7. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (VII)4 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION ON INTERSTATE 83 IN
BALTIMORE COUNTY OR ON INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(vii) 1. Not more than six mobile or stationary speed monitoring
systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
2. Not more than two speed monitoring systems may be placed
on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
3. Not more than one speed monitoring system may be placed
at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot
County.
4. THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION:
A. MAY PLACE AND USE A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY AT A LOCATION IT IDENTIFIES AS BEING AT
HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN DEATH OR SERIOUS
BODILY INJURY;
B. I. MAY NOT PLACE OR USE MORE THAN THREE
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS IN EACH DIRECTION ON INTERSTATE 83 IN
BALTIMORE COUNTY; AND
II. MAY NOT PLACE OR USE MORE THAN FOUR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS IN EACH DIRECTION ON INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY; AND
C. MAY NOT PLACE OR USE A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 5 MILES OF ANOTHER SPEED
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
MONITORING SYSTEM AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION OPERATING IN THE SAME
DIRECTION.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local jurisdiction
OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE, shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, based on proximity
to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, [or] at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road)
and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, OR ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY
OR INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY, ensure that all speed limit signs
approaching and within the segment of highway on which the speed monitoring system is
located include signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road) between the
Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard County line,
[or] at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot
County, OR ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE 695 IN
BALTIMORE COUNTY, ensure that each sign that indicates that a speed monitoring system
is in use is proximate to a device that displays a real–time posting of the speed at which a
driver is traveling.
– 17 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ix) A speed monitoring system in a school zone may operate only
Monday through Friday between 6:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
(x) 1. A local jurisdiction that authorizes a program of speed
monitoring systems OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE,
shall designate an official or employee to investigate and respond to questions or concerns
about the local jurisdiction’s OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION’S speed
monitoring system program.
2. A. The [local] designee shall review a citation
generated by a speed monitoring system if the person who received the citation requests
review before the deadline for contesting liability under this section.
B. If the [local] designee determines that the citation is an
erroneous violation, the [local] designee shall void the citation.
C. If the [local] designee determines that a person did not
receive notice of a citation issued under this section due to an administrative error, the
[local] designee may resend the citation in accordance with subsection (d) of this section or
void the citation.
D. A [local] designee that takes any action described under
subsubsubparagraph C of this subsubparagraph shall notify the Administration of the
action for the purpose of rescinding any administrative penalties imposed under subsection
(g) of this section.
E. A [local] designee may not determine that a citation is an
erroneous violation based solely on the dismissal of the citation by a court.
3. A [local] designee may not be employed by a speed
monitoring system contractor or have been involved in any review of a speed monitoring
system citation, other than review of a citation under this subparagraph.
4. On receipt of a written question or concern from a person,
the [local] designee shall provide a written answer or response to the person within a
reasonable time.
5. A local jurisdiction AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE, shall make any written questions or concerns
received under this subparagraph and any subsequent written answers or responses
available for public inspection.
(xi) A local jurisdiction may not use a speed monitoring system to
enforce speed limits on any portion of a highway for which the speed limit has been decreased
without performing an engineering and traffic investigation.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(2) (i) A speed monitoring system operator shall complete training by a
manufacturer of speed monitoring systems in the procedures for setting up and operating
the speed monitoring system.
(ii) The manufacturer shall issue a signed certificate to the speed
monitoring system operator on completion of the training.
(iii) The certificate of training shall be admitted as evidence in any
court proceeding for a violation of this section.
(3) A speed monitoring system operator shall fill out and sign a daily
set–up log for a speed monitoring system that:
(i) States that the speed monitoring system operator successfully
performed or reviewed and evaluated the manufacturer–specified daily self–test of the speed
monitoring system prior to producing a recorded image;
(ii) Shall be kept on file; and
(iii) Shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for a
violation of this section.
(4) (i) A speed monitoring system shall undergo an annual calibration
check performed by an independent calibration laboratory that is:
1. Selected by the local jurisdiction OR THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE; and
2. Unaffiliated with the manufacturer of the speed
monitoring system.
(ii) The independent calibration laboratory shall issue a signed
certificate of calibration after the annual calibration check that:
1. Shall be kept on file; and
2. Shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for
a violation of this section.
(5) If a local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION
authorizes a program of speed monitoring systems under this section:
(i) The local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION shall designate a program administrator who may not be an employee
or representative of the speed monitoring system contractor; and
– 19 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The contract with the speed monitoring system contractor shall
include the following provisions:
1. For potential violations submitted by a contractor for
review by an agency, if more than 5% of the violations in a calendar year are erroneous
violations, then the contractor shall be subject to liquidated damages for each erroneous
violation equal to at least 50% of the fine amount for the erroneous violation, plus any
reimbursements paid by the local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION; and
2. The local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION may cancel a contract with a contractor if the contractor violates the
contract by submitting erroneous violations to the agency that exceed a threshold specified
in the contract or violates the law in implementing the contract.
(6) (i) The Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission, in
consultation with the State Highway Administration and other interested stakeholders,
shall develop a training program concerning the oversight and administration of a speed
monitoring program by a local jurisdiction AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, including a curriculum of best practices in the State.
(ii) 1. A program administrator shall participate in the training
program established under this paragraph before a local jurisdiction OR THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION initially implements a new speed monitoring program and
subsequently at least once every 2 years.
2. A program administrator for a program in existence on
June 1, 2014, shall initially participate in the training program on or before December 31,
2014, and subsequently at least once every 2 years.
3. If a local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION designates a new program administrator, the new program
administrator shall participate in the next available training program.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this subsection,
an agency shall mail to an owner liable under subsection (c) of this section a citation that
shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
employed by or under contract with an agency that, based on inspection of recorded images,
the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; and
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. Is an admission of liability;
2. May result in the refusal by the Administration to register
the motor vehicle; and
– 21 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration.
(2) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraph] SUBPARAGRAPHS (ii)
AND (III) of this paragraph, an agency may mail a warning notice instead of a citation to
the owner liable under subsection (c) of this section.
(ii) With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, an agency shall mail a warning notice instead of a citation
for a violation recorded by the speed monitoring system during the first 90 days that the
speed monitoring system is in operation.
(III) WITH REGARD TO A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
ESTABLISHED ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE 695 IN
BALTIMORE COUNTY, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL MAIL A
WARNING NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY THE
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM DURING THE FIRST 30 DAYS THAT THE SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN OPERATION.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (f)(4) of this section, an agency may not
mail a citation to a person who is not an owner.
(4) Except as provided in subsections (b)(1)(x) and (f)(4) of this section, a
citation issued under this section shall be mailed no later than 2 weeks after the alleged
violation if the vehicle is registered in this State, and 30 days after the alleged violation if
the vehicle is registered in another state.
(5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty, in accordance with instructions on the
citation, directly to the political subdivision OR THE DISTRICT COURT, AS APPROPRIATE;
or
(ii) Elect to stand trial in the District Court for the alleged violation.
(6) To mail the citation or warning notice, an agency shall use:
(i) The current mailing address on file with the Administration; or
(ii) If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
(e) (1) A certificate alleging that the violation of this subtitle occurred and the
requirements under subsection (b) of this section have been satisfied, sworn to, or affirmed
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
by a duly authorized law enforcement officer employed by or under contract with an agency,
based on inspection of recorded images produced by a speed monitoring system, shall be
evidence of the facts contained in the certificate and shall be admissible in a proceeding
alleging a violation under this section without the presence or testimony of the speed
monitoring system operator who performed the requirements under subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) If a person who received a citation under subsection (d) of this section
desires the speed monitoring system operator to be present and testify at trial, the person
shall notify the court and the State in writing no later than 20 days before trial.
(3) Adjudication of liability shall be based on a preponderance of evidence.
(f) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that the motor vehicle
or the registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen before the violation occurred and
were not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(ii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, evidence that the
person named in the citation was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; and
(iii) Any other issues and evidence that the District Court deems
pertinent.
(2) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle or the registration plates were
stolen before the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the owner
at the time of the violation, the owner shall submit proof that a police report regarding the
stolen motor vehicle or registration plates was filed in a timely manner.
(3) To satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in the citation shall provide to the District Court a letter, sworn
to or affirmed by the person and mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, that:
(i) States that the person named in the citation was not operating the
vehicle at the time of the violation; and
(ii) Includes any other corroborating evidence.
(4) (i) If the District Court finds that the person named in the citation
was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation or receives evidence under
paragraph (3) of this subsection identifying the person driving the vehicle at the time of the
violation, the clerk of the court shall provide to the agency issuing the citation a copy of any
evidence substantiating who was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.
– 23 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) On receipt of substantiating evidence from the District Court
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, an agency may issue a citation as provided in
subsection (d) of this section to the person who the evidence indicates was operating the
vehicle at the time of the violation.
(iii) A citation issued under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall
be mailed no later than 2 weeks after receipt of the evidence from the District Court.
(g) If a person liable under this section does not pay the civil penalty or contest the
violation, the Administration may refuse to register or reregister the motor vehicle cited for
the violation.
(h) A violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this section:
(1) Is not a moving violation for the purpose of assessing points under §
16–402 of this article;
(2) May not be recorded by the Administration on the driving record of the
owner or driver of the vehicle;
(3) May be treated as a parking violation for purposes of § 26–305 of this
article; and
(4) May not be considered in the provision of motor vehicle insurance
coverage.
(i) In consultation with the appropriate local government agencies AND THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall adopt
procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of civil violations, and the collection of civil
penalties under this section.
(j) (1) An agency or an agent or contractor designated by the agency shall
administer and process civil citations issued under this section in coordination with the
District Court.
(2) If a contractor in any manner operates a speed monitoring system or
administers or processes citations generated by a speed monitoring system on behalf of a
local jurisdiction OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, the contractor’s fee may
not be contingent on a per–ticket basis on the number of citations issued or paid.
(k) (1) On or before December 31 of each year, the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission shall:
(i) Compile and make publicly available a report for the previous
fiscal year on each speed monitoring system program operated by a local jurisdiction AND
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION under this section; and
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(ii) Submit the report to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) The report shall include:
(i) The total number of citations issued;
(ii) The number of citations issued and the number voided as
erroneous violations for each camera;
(iii) The gross revenue generated by the program;
(iv) The expenditures incurred by the program;
(v) The net revenue generated by the program;
(vi) The total amount of any payments made to a contractor under the
program;
(vii) A description of how the net revenue generated by the program
was used;
(viii) The number of employees of the local jurisdiction OR THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE, involved in the program;
(ix) The type of speed monitoring system used by the local jurisdiction
OR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION;
(x) The locations at which each speed monitoring system was used in
the local jurisdiction OR ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE
695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY;
(xi) The activation start and stop dates of each speed monitoring
system for each location at which it was used; and
(xii) The number of citations issued by each speed monitoring system
at each location.
(3) Each local jurisdiction with a speed monitoring system program AND
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION shall submit the information required under
paragraph (2) of this subsection to the Commission by October 31 of each year and assist the
Commission in the preparation of the annual report.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
– 25 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(c) (2) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed:
[(i)] 1. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
[(ii)] 2. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
[(iii)] 3. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
[(iv)] 4. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; and
[(v)] 5. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by 40 miles per hour or more, $425.
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR A
VIOLATION RECORDED ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR INTERSTATE
695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2025, contingent on the taking effect of Chapter ____ or ____ (S.B. 118 or
H.B. 182) of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025, and if Chapter ____ or _____ (S.B.
118 or H.B. 182) does not take effect, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 1, 2030 2029, the State Highway Administration shall
submit a report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly, on the speed monitoring systems placed on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County and Interstate 83 in Baltimore County in accordance with § 21–811
21–809 of the Transportation Article as, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) any changes since the implementation of speed monitoring systems
under Section 1 of this Act in:
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 582
(i) accident crash and fatality rates on Interstate 695 and Interstate
83 in Baltimore County; and
(ii) the number of repeat violations recorded by these speed
monitoring systems;
(2) any measurable improvements in driver awareness and compliance
with posted speed limits at areas on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County and Interstate 83
in Baltimore County where speed monitoring systems are operated;
(3) any unintended consequences including traffic congestion or an
increase in the use of alternative routes;
(4) the gross revenue collected as a result of violations enforced by the
speed monitoring systems;
(5) the percentage of the gross revenue collected that has been used to:
(i) to recover the cost of implementing and administering the speed
monitoring systems; and
(ii) for public safety purposes, including pedestrian or highway
safety programs assist in covering the cost of roadway and safety improvements on Interstate
695 in Baltimore County and Interstate 83 in Baltimore County;
(6) whether revenue collected as a result of violations enforced by the speed
monitoring systems has been sufficient to cover the costs specified under paragraph (5)(i)
and (ii) of this subsection;
(7) how funds have been used for public safety purposes on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County and Interstate 83 in Baltimore County;
(8) whether revenue collected has been supplemental to, and has not
supplanted, existing State and local funds allocated for transportation;
(9) the percentage of issued citations that have been contested;
(10) the percentage of contested citations that were overturned or reduced;
(11) whether citations have consistently been issued within the time frames
required under § 21–811(d)(4) 21–809(d)(4) of the Transportation Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act, and any required maintenance, calibration, and certification checks
have been documented and performed as scheduled;
– 27 –

Ch. 582 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(12) whether there has been any pattern of citation errors or disputes
regarding vehicle identification;
(13) whether speed monitoring systems have been consistently maintained
and calibrated in accordance with § 21–811(b)(7) 21–809(b)(4) of the Transportation Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(14) whether the locations that have been identified as being at high risk for
motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death have changed since the
implementation of the speed monitoring systems;
(15) whether speed monitoring systems have been relocated as a result of
any changes under item (14) of this subsection, or any changes in traffic patterns;
(16) whether the speed limit thresholds under § 21–811(b)(4) tolerance of 12
miles per hour under § 21–809 of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act have has effectively influenced driver behavior on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County
and Interstate 83 in Baltimore County;
(17) any issues with speed monitoring system visibility, signage, or
technical malfunctions;
(18) whether there have been any formal complaints or legal challenges to
the implementation of speed monitoring systems under Section 1 of this Act;
(19) any privacy or data security concerns that have arisen from the
handling of recorded images or citation data;
(20) any significant delays in processing citations or appeals; and
(21) whether any public safety improvements intended to be funded by
revenue derived as a result of violations enforced by the speed monitoring systems have
been completed on schedule and within budget; and
(22) any disparities in the number of citations issued as a result of violations
enforced by the speed monitoring systems on different communities or demographic groups
in the State.
SECTION 2. 3. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective
for a period of 5 years and 1 month 4 years and 9 months and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 28 –